Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1303
Stagnant water; raising or producing, unlawful; penalty; abatement.

Whoever shall build, erect, continue or keep up any dam or other obstruction in any river or stream of water in this state and thereby raise an artificial pond, or produce stagnant waters, which shall be manifestly injurious to the public health and safety, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and the court shall, moreover, order every such nuisance to be abated or removed.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 287.